Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-323
Submission of question to voters; notice.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall give notice of the submission of the question of imposing a tax under section 13-319 not more than thirty days nor less than ten days before the election, by publication one time in one or more newspapers published in or of general circulation in the municipality or county in which the question is to be submitted. This notice is in addition to any other notice required under the Election Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1177, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 9.

Election Act, see section 32-101.